New York, session 2025-2026, A4437.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13-c of the domestic relations law is REPEALED and 2 a new section 13-c is added to read as follows: 3 § 13-c. Twenty-four hour provision waived in certain cases. Notwith- 4 standing the provisions of section thirteen-b of this article or any 5 other provision of law, where either of the parties making application 6 for a marriage license pursuant to section thirteen of this article, is 7 a member of the armed forces of the United States, the marriage of the 8 parties may be solemnized without waiting for the lapse of the twenty- 9 four hour period required by section thirteen-b of this article. Proof 10 that the applicant is a member of the armed forces of the United States 11 shall be furnished to the satisfaction of the official issuing the 12 marriage license. Every license to marry issued pursuant to the 13 provisions of this section must state the day and hour the license is 14 issued and shall contain a recital that it is issued pursuant to the 15 provisions of this section and that the parties named therein may be 16 married at any time after such day and hour and within sixty days there- 17 after. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04641-01-5